Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.121

Denial or revocation of certification—Subsequent certification as corrections officer or peace officer.

An individual whose peace officer certification is denied or revoked pursuant to this chapter may not thereafter be certified as a corrections officer without first satisfying the requirements of eligibility for certification or reinstatement of certification. A corrections officer whose corrections officer certification is denied or revoked pursuant to this chapter may not thereafter be certified as a peace officer without first satisfying the requirements of eligibility for certification or reinstatement of certification.

[ 2020 c 119 s 11.]